Washington statutes.
RCW 43.168.130

Development of performance standards.

The director shall develop performance standards for judging the effectiveness of the program. Such standards shall include, to the extent possible, examining the effectiveness of grants in regard to:

(1) Job creation for individuals of low and moderate income;

(2) Retention of existing employment;

(3) The creation of new employment opportunities;

(4) The diversification of the economic base of local communities;

(5) The establishment of employee cooperatives;

(6) The provision of assistance in cases of employee buy-outs of firms to prevent the loss of existing employment;

(7) The degree of risk assumed by the fund, with emphasis on loans which did not receive financing from commercial lenders, but which are considered financially sound.

[ 2005 c 136 s 10; 1998 c 245 s 52; 1987 c 461 s 7.]

NOTES:

Savings—Effective date—2005 c 136: See notes following RCW 43.168.020.